Washington statutes.
RCW 13.20.010

Board of managers—Appointment authorized—Composition.

The judges of the superior court of any county with a population of one million or more are hereby authorized, by majority vote, to appoint a board of managers to administer, subject to the approval and authority of such superior court, the probation and detention services for dependent and delinquent children coming under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

Such board shall consist of four citizens of the county and the judge who has been selected to preside over the juvenile court.

[ 1991 c 363 s 12; 1955 c 232 s 1.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.